Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-225
Fur harvesting, defined.

Fur harvesting means taking or attempting to take any fur-bearing animal by any means as prescribed by rules and regulations of the commission.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 35.